Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 6 Predatory Animals

Cross references. —

As to unlawful killing of wild horses, see §

11-30-115

.

As to expenditure of moneys derived from grazing fees under Taylor Grazing Act, see §

9-4-404

.

For definition of “predatory animals” in connection with game and fish laws, see §

23-1-101

.

As to killing of predatory animals by hunters and by animal damage control agents of game and fish department, see §

23-3-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 42; 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 71, 72.

Liability of public officers for killing or injuring animals, while acting or professing to act under a statute relating to the inspection or destruction of livestock, 2 ALR3d 822.

Doctrine of absolute liability for injury inflicted by wild animal, 21 ALR3d 603.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 170 to 237.